Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1782.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [192.054] DEFEND THE GUARD; ACTIVE DUTY COMBAT. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section: new text end new text begin (1) "active duty combat" means performing the following services in the active federal military service of the United States: new text end new text begin (i) participation in an armed conflict; new text end new text begin (ii) performance of a hazardous service relating to an armed conflict in a foreign state; or new text end new text begin (iii) performance of a duty through an instrumentality of war; and new text end new text begin (2) "official declaration of war" means an official declaration of war made by the United States Congress pursuant to the United States Constitution, Article I, section 8, clause (11). new text end new text begin (b) Notwithstanding section 192.05, the Minnesota National Guard, and any member of the Minnesota National Guard, must not be released from the state into active duty combat unless the United States Congress has passed an official declaration of war or has taken an official action pursuant to the United States Constitution, Article I, section 8, clause (15), to explicitly call forth the Minnesota National Guard, and any member of the Minnesota National Guard, to expressly execute the laws of the union, repel an invasion, or suppress an insurrection. The governor must take all actions necessary to comply with the requirements of this section. new text end new text begin (c) Nothing in this section limits or prohibits the governor from consenting to the deployment of any Minnesota National Guard member under United States Code, title 32, to provide defense support for civil authority missions in the United States and United States territories. new text end